Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Chapter 7. Absentee Voting.
§ 24.2-709.1.
Processing returned absentee ballots before election day; cure process.

On receipt of an absentee ballot returned in person or by mail to the office of the general registrar or to a drop-off location before election day, the general registrar shall mark the date of receipt in the voter’s record and shall examine the ballot envelope to verify completion of the required voter affirmation. A voter affirmation statement shall not be deemed to be incomplete on the sole basis of the voter’s failure to provide (i) his full name or his middle initial, as long as the voter provided his full first and last name, or (ii) the date, or any part of the date, including the year, on which he signed the statement.

If the voter affirmation has been completed as required, the general registrar may open the sealed ballot envelope and insert the ballot in optical scan counting equipment or other secure ballot container without initiating any ballot count totals. If a general registrar does not choose to do so, the sealed ballot envelope shall be deposited into a secure container provided for such purpose, in which it shall remain until the general registrar initiates the process of opening the sealed ballot envelopes deposited into the secure container and inserting such ballots into optical scan counting equipment without initiating any ballot count totals. Such process shall be at the general registrar’s discretion at any time prior to the seventh day immediately preceding the election but shall be mandatory beginning on the seventh day immediately preceding the election.At least two officers of election, one representing each political party, shall be present during all hours when sealed ballot envelopes are opened as authorized in or required by this subsection. No person present while sealed ballot envelopes are opened and ballots are inserted into counting equipment shall disclose any information concerning the ballots.In the event that circumstances prevent a general registrar from complying with the provisions of this subsection, such failure shall not be grounds for contesting the election pursuant to Article 2 (§

24.2-803

et seq.) of Chapter 8 and shall not invalidate the absentee ballots.

For any absentee ballot received by the Friday immediately preceding the day of the election, if the general registrar finds during the examination of the ballot envelope that the required voter affirmation was not correctly or completely filled out or that a procedure required by §

24.2-707

was not properly followed, and such error or failure would render the ballot void by law, the general registrar shall enter into the voter’s record in the voter registration system that the absentee ballot has an issue requiring correction in order for it to be counted. This information shall be included on any absentee voter applicant list provided pursuant to subsection C of §

24.2-710

.Within three days of such finding, the registrar shall notify the voter in writing or by email of the error or failure and shall provide information to the voter on how to correct the issue so his ballot may be counted. The voter shall be entitled to make such necessary corrections before noon on the third day after the election, and his ballot shall then be counted pursuant to the procedures set forth in this chapter if he is found to be entitled to vote. No absentee ballot needing correction shall be delivered to the officers of election at the appropriate precinct until the voter is provided the opportunity to make the necessary corrections pursuant to this subsection.The general registrar may issue a new absentee ballot to the voter if necessary and shall preserve the first ballot with other spoiled ballots.

History.

2007, cc. 171, 281; 2012, cc. 328, 486; 2013, c. 501; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 471, 522.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 86.10, as added by Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides:

“A. 1. For the general election and special elections to be held November 3, 2020, upon receipt of an absentee ballot returned before October 31, 2020, each general registrar shall examine the ballot envelopes to verify completion of the required voter affirmation.

“2. If the general registrar finds during the examination of a returned absentee ballot envelope that the required voter affirmation was not correctly or completely filled out or that a procedure required by §

24.2-707

of the Code of Virginia was not properly followed, and such error or failure shall render the ballot void by law, the general registrar shall, within three days of such finding, notify the voter of the error or failure. However, notwithstanding the provisions of §§

24.2-706

and

24.2-707

of the Code of Virginia, the failure of an absentee voter marking and returning a mail absentee ballot for the November 3, 2020, general election, and any special election or ballot measure held on that date, to have a witness sign the statement on the back of the absentee ballot return envelope shall not be considered a material omission and shall not render his ballot void. Such notice shall be made by phone, email, or in writing and shall provide information to the voter as to how to correct the issue so his ballot may be counted. The voter shall be entitled to make such necessary corrections before noon on the third day after the election, and his ballot shall then be counted pursuant to the procedures set forth in §

24.2-709.1

of the Code of Virginia if he is found to be entitled to vote. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no absentee ballot needing correction shall be delivered to the officers of election at the appropriate precinct until the voter is provided the opportunity to make the necessary corrections pursuant to this subparagraph.

“3. The general registrar may issue a new absentee ballot to the voter if necessary and shall preserve the first ballot with other spoiled ballots.

“B. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the general election and special elections to be held on November 3, 2020, mailed absentee ballots shall be returned (i) by mail to the office of the general registrar, (ii) by the voter in person to the general registrar, (iii) to a drop-off location, or (iv) by commercial delivery service.

“2. Mailed absentee ballots shall provide instructions that include information on the locations of all drop-off locations available in the locality at the time such ballots are mailed by the general registrar.

“3. The general registrar of each county or city shall establish at the office of the general registrar and each voter satellite office in operation for an election a drop-off location for the purpose of allowing voters to deposit completed absentee ballots for such election. On the day of the election, there shall also be a drop-off location at each polling place in operation for the election. The general registrar may establish additional drop-off locations within the county or city as he deems necessary. All drop-off locations shall be accessible; be on public property, unless located at a polling place; and otherwise comply with any criteria for drop-off locations set by the Department of Elections.

“4. The Department of Elections shall set standards for the establishment and operation of drop-off locations, including necessary security requirements. The Department of Elections shall submit such standards to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Privileges and Elections, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, and the House Committee on Appropriations within 30 days of the effective date of this act [September 4, 2020].

“5. The general registrar of a county or city utilizing drop-off locations shall post notice of the locations of the drop-off locations in the locality in the office of the general registrar and on the official website for the county or city. Such notice shall remain in the office of the general registrar and on the official website for the county or city for the duration of the period during which absentee ballots may be returned.

“6. Absentee ballots shall be collected from drop-off locations in accordance with the instructions provided by the Department of Elections. Such instructions shall include chain of custody requirements and recordkeeping requirements. Absentee ballots shall be collected at least daily, by two officers of election representing the two major political parties, when practicable, or by two employees from the office of the general registrar, unless the drop-off location is in the office of the general registrar, in which case the general registrar or an assistant general registrar may collect the absentee ballots.

“7. Any ballot returned to a drop-off location in any manner except as prescribed by law shall be void. Absentee ballots shall be returned to a drop-off location before the closing of the polls. Any voter who is in line to return the voter’s absentee ballot at a drop-off location by 7:00 p.m. on the day of the election shall be permitted to deposit the absentee ballot.

“C. 1. The general registrar shall include with the absentee ballot prescribed in §

24.2-706

of the Code of Virginia, an envelope, properly addressed and postage prepaid, for the return of the ballot to the general registrar by mail for the general election and special elections held on November 3, 2020.

“2. Included in this appropriation is up to $2,000,000 the first year from the general fund to reimburse localities for the cost of prepaid postage required in subparagraph C.1. of this Item. This amount shall remain unallotted until the Department of Elections provides documentation of qualifying amounts to be reimbursed to localities for prepaid postage of return absentee ballots and shall not be used or otherwise obligated for any other purposes.”

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, cl. 2 provides: “That this act is effective on its passage [September 4, 2020] as provided in §

1-214

of the Code of Virginia.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 328 and 486 are identical, and deleted “capable of being read with optical scan counting devices and” following “absentee ballots” in the introductory clause, and substituted “ballots in optical scan counting equipment or other secure ballot container” for “ballots in the optical scan counting equipment” in clause (iii), of the first sentence, substituted “authorizes the opening of sealed ballot envelopes” for “authorizes optical scanning” in the second sentence, and inserted “or other secure ballot container” in the third sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 501, in the first sentence, substituted “Each” for “The electoral board may authorize a” and “shall” for “at his option to,” and substituted “general registrar proceeds to open” for “board authorizes the opening of” in the second sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 471 and 522, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and rewrote the section.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Death of absentee voter prior to election. —

When a general registrar knows that an absentee voter has died prior to election day, but after having voted by absentee ballot, the registrar must cancel that voter’s registration, and the absentee ballot should not be counted; but when absentee ballots are cast prior to election day in a manner by which the absentee ballot no longer can be set aside, the general registrar who knows of the voter’s death shall cancel that voter’s registration, but election officials are not otherwise required to perform the impossible task of not counting the deceased voter’s absentee ballot. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Robin R. Lind, Secretary, Goochland County Electoral Board, 10-104, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 71 (10/26/10).

§ 24.2-710.
Absentee voter applicant lists.

The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to those localities not using an electronic pollbook. On the day before the election, the general registrar shall (i) make out in triplicate on a form prescribed by the State Board the absentee voter applicant list containing the names of all persons who applied for an absentee ballot through the third day before the election and (ii) by noon on the day before the election, deliver two copies of the list to the electoral board. The general registrar shall make out a supplementary list containing the names of all persons voting absentee in person or applying to vote absentee pursuant to §

24.2-705

for delivery by 5:00 p.m. on the day before the election. The supplementary list shall be deemed part of the absentee voter applicant list and shall be prepared and delivered in accordance with the instructions of the State Board. The general registrar shall maintain one copy of the list in his office for two years as a public record open for inspection upon request during regular office hours.

On the day before the election, the electoral board shall deliver one copy of the list provided to it by the general registrar to the chief officer of election for each precinct. The list shall be attested by the secretary of the electoral board who shall be responsible for the delivery of the attested lists to the chief officer of election for each precinct.Absentee ballots shall be accepted only from voters whose names appear on the attested list.

Upon request, the State Board shall provide an electronic copy of the absentee voter applicant list to any political party or candidate. Such lists shall be used only for campaign and political purposes. In no event shall any list furnished under this section contain (a) any voter’s social security number or any part thereof, (b) any voter’s day and month of birth, or (c) the residence address of any voter who has provided a post office box address to be used on public lists pursuant to §

24.2-418

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-327, 24-330, 24-332, 24-333, 24-338, 24-338.1, 24-339, 24-340, 24-341, 24-342, 24-345.6, 24-345.7, 24-345.8; 1952, c. 509; 1954, cc. 511, 523, 539; 1956, c. 525; 1958, c. 351; 1962, c. 536; 1964, c. 557; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-229, 24.1-231, 24.1-234; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 119, 247, 265; 1972, cc. 620, 621; 1974, c. 428, § 24.1-233.1; 1975, c. 515; 1977, c. 490; 1978, c. 778; 1980, c. 639; 1981, c. 425; 1983, c. 461; 1988, cc. 624, 691; 1991, c. 3; 1993, c. 641; 1997, c. 464; 2001, cc. 622, 799; 2006, c. 297; 2010, cc. 601, 812; 2017, c. 275; 2020, cc. 735, 1157; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 471, 522.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 622 substituted “§§

24.2-705

.1 and

24.2-705

.2, or applying to vote absentee pursuant to § 24.2-705, for delivery and posting by 5:00 p.m.” for “§

24.2-705.1

for delivery and posting by 4:00 p.m.” in the second paragraph.

The 2001 amendment by c. 799 deleted “and post a copy in the general registrar’s office” at the end of the first sentence in the second paragraph; deleted “and posting” following “delivery” in the second sentence in the second paragraph; and inserted “upon request” near the end of the fourth sentence in the second paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 297 added the second sentence in the fifth paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 601 added the exception at the end of first sentence in the seventh paragraph.

The 2010 amendment by c. 812 added the last paragraph.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 275 inserted “unless the registrar opts to open sealed ballot envelopes in order to expedite the counting of absentee ballots in accordance with §

24.2-709.1

” in the last sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 735, in the seventh paragraph, substituted “§

24.2-653.01

” for “§

24.2-653

” in the first sentence; and in the last paragraph, substituted the designations “(a)” etc. for “(i)” etc.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1157, deleted “pursuant to §§

24.2-705.1

and 24.2-705.2” following “in person” in the second sentence of the second paragraph and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I cc. 471 and 522, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For article, “Election Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 575 (2001).

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

§ 24.2-711.
Duties of electoral board, general registrar, and officers of election.

Before the polls open, the officers of election at each precinct shall mark, for each person on the absentee voter applicant list, the letters “AB” (meaning absentee ballot) in the voting record column on the pollbook. The pollbook may be so marked prior to election day by the general registrar, the secretary of the electoral board, or staff under the direction of the general registrar or the secretary, or when the pollbook is produced by the State Board pursuant to §

24.2-404

. If the pollbook has been marked prior to election day, before the polls open the officers of election at each precinct shall check the marks for accuracy and make any additions or corrections required.The chief officer of election shall keep the copy of the absentee voter applicant list in the polling place as a public record open for inspection upon request at all times while the polls are open.

Before noon on the day following the election, the general registrar shall deliver all applications for absentee ballots for the election, under seal, to the clerk of the circuit court for the county or city, except that the general registrar may retain all applications for absentee ballots until the electoral board has ascertained the results of the election pursuant to §

24.2-671

, and has determined the validity of and counted all provisional ballots pursuant to §

24.2-653.01

, at which point all applications shall then be delivered, under seal, to the clerk of the circuit court for the county or city. The clerk shall retain the sealed applications with the counted ballots.

The secretary of the electoral board shall deliver all absentee ballots received after the election to the clerk of the circuit court.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-330, 24-338, 24-338.1, 24-339, 24-340, 24-341, 24-342, 24-345.8; 1952, c. 509; 1954, cc. 511, 523, 539; 1956, c. 525; 1962, c. 536; 1964, c. 557; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-231, 24.1-234; 1972, c. 621; 1974, c. 428, § 24.1-233.1; 1978, c. 778; 1981, c. 425; 1988, cc. 624, 691; 1991, c. 3; 1993, c. 641; 2001, c. 799; 2002, cc. 785, 819; 2003, c. 1015; 2006, c. 283; 2013, c. 501; 2014, cc. 453, 574, 575; 2017, c. 276; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 471, 522.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 799 rewrote the second paragraph, which formerly read: “Before the polls open, the chief officer of election shall post the copy of the absentee voter applicant list in the polling place.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by cc. 785 and 819 are identical, and added the last two sentences to the first paragraph.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, in the first paragraph, substituted “pollbook” for “precinct registered voter list,” and twice substituted “pollbook” for “list,” and in the fourth paragraph, substituted “an officer shall mark the voter’s name on the pollbook with the first or next consecutive number from the voter count form, or shall enter that the voter has voted if the pollbook is in electronic form” for “his name shall be entered in the pollbook,” and “container” for “box.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 283, in the third paragraph, inserted “§

24.2-653.1

and” and deleted “or, if the locality has a central absentee voter precinct, shall refuse to give him a ballot and shall refer him to the officers of the absentee precinct for an appeal pursuant to §

24.2-712

” at the end.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 501 inserted “Immediately” at the beginning of the fourth paragraph and made a related change.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 453 and 575 are identical, and added the sixth sentence in the fourth paragraph.

The 2014 amendment by c. 574 added the seventh sentence in the fourth paragraph.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 276 substituted “At least two officers of election, one representing each political party,” for “A majority of the officers” in the last sentence of the fourth paragraph.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 471 and 522, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and rewrote the section.

§ 24.2-711.1.
Absentee ballots; confirmation of receipt; notice of reason for rejection.

The Secretary, in coordination with local election officials, shall implement a free-access system by which a voter may determine:

Whether the voter’s application for an absentee ballot has been received and accepted; and

Whether the voter’s absentee ballot has been received and the current status of the absentee ballot.

The electoral board of each county and city shall send a written explanation of the reason for rejection of an absentee ballot to the voter whose absentee ballot is rejected within 90 days of the date on which the ballot is rejected. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate instructions to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

2002, c. 252; 2013, c. 537.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 537 added subsection A and the B designator and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 24.2-712.
Central absentee voter precincts; counting ballots.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing body of each county or city shall establish one or more central absentee voter precincts in the courthouse or other public buildings for the purpose of receiving, counting, and recording absentee ballots cast in the county or city. A central absentee voter precinct shall be made by the governing body by ordinance; the ordinance shall state for which elections the precinct shall be used. The decision to abolish any absentee voter precinct shall be made by the governing body by ordinance. Immediate notification of either decision shall be sent to the Department of Elections and the electoral board.

Each central absentee voter precinct shall have at least three officers of election as provided for other precincts. The number of officers shall be determined by the electoral board and general registrar.

If any voter brings an unmarked ballot to the central absentee voter precinct on the day of the election, he shall be allowed to vote it. If any voter brings an unmarked ballot to the general registrar on or before the day of the election, he shall be allowed to vote it, and his ballot shall be delivered to the absentee voter precinct.

Absentee ballots shall be processed as required by §

24.2-709.1

by the officers of election at the central absentee voter precinct prior to the closing of the polls. In the case of machine-readable ballots, the ballot container shall be opened and the absentee ballots shall be inserted in the counting machines prior to the closing of the polls in accordance with procedures prescribed by the Department of Elections, including procedures to preserve ballot secrecy, but no ballot count totals by the machines shall be transmitted outside of the central absentee voter precinct until after the closing of the polls.In the case of absentee ballots that are counted by hand, the officers of election shall begin tallying such ballots at any time after noon on the day of the election in accordance with the procedures prescribed by the Department of Elections, including procedures to preserve ballot secrecy. No counts of such tallies shall be determined or transmitted outside of the central absentee voter precinct until after the closing of the polls.The use of cellular telephones or other communication devices shall be prohibited in the central absentee voter precinct during such processing and tallying and until the closing of the polls. Any person present in the central absentee voter precinct shall sign a statement under oath that he will not transmit any counts prior to the closing of the polls. Any person who transmits any counts in violation of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

As soon as the polls are closed in the county or city, the officers of election at the central absentee voter precinct shall proceed promptly to ascertain and record the total vote given by all absentee ballots and report the results in the manner provided for counting and reporting ballots generally in Article 4 (§

24.2-643

et seq.) of Chapter 6.

The electoral board or general registrar may provide that the officers of election for a central absentee voter precinct may be assigned to work all or a portion of the time that the precinct is open on election day subject to the following conditions:

The chief officer and the assistant chief officer, appointed pursuant to §

24.2-115

to represent the two political parties, are on duty at all times; and

No officer, political party representative, or other candidate representative shall leave the precinct after any ballots have been counted until the polls are closed and the count for the precinct is completed and reported.

The general registrar may provide that the central absentee voter precinct will open after 6:00 a.m. on the day of the election provided that the office of the general registrar will be open for the receipt of absentee ballots until the central absentee voter precinct is open and that the officers of election for the central absentee voter precinct obtain the absentee ballots returned to the general registrar’s office for the purpose of counting the absentee ballots at the central absentee voter precinct and provided further that the central absentee voter precinct is the same location as the office of the general registrar.

History.

1974, c. 428, § 24.1-233.1; 1978, c. 778; 1991, c. 3; 1993, c. 641; 1994, cc. 287, 742; 1998, cc. 549, 572; 2003, c. 1015; 2006, c. 297; 2008, c. 423; 2013, c. 501; 2014, cc. 540, 552, 576; 2015, cc. 313, 644, 645; 2016, cc. 18, 492; 2017, c. 711; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 471, 522.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 86 A, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “It is the intention of the General Assembly that all local precincts, other than central absentee precincts established under §

24.2-712

, Code of Virginia, will use electronic pollbooks for elections held beginning in November, 2010.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, twice substituted “container” for “box” in subsection D.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 297 substituted “pursuant to §

24.2-710

” for “before the closing of the polls” at the end of the first paragraph in subsection C.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 423 added subsection F.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 501, in the second paragraph of subsection D, inserted “promptly” and deleted “of this title” at the end.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical and, in subsection D, substituted “machine-readable” for “punch card or mark sense,” “machines” for “equipment,” and deleted “to be inserted in electronic counting equipment” preceding “the ballot container.”

The 2014 amendment by c. 552 deleted “and at any time before noon” following “after 6:00 a.m.” in subsection F.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 313 substituted “Department of Elections” for “State Board” in subsections A and D and inserted “or other evidence” following “certificate” in the second sentence of subsection C.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” in the first paragraph of subsection C; and deleted “electoral board, with the written agreement of the” preceding “general registrar” and deleted the comma thereafter near the beginning of subsection F.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and in subsection B, inserted “and general registrar” at the end; and inserted “or general registrar” in subsection E.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 711, in subsection D, in the first paragraph, deleted “but the ballot container shall not be opened and the counting of ballots shall not begin prior to that time” at the end of the first sentence, inserted “by the machines” and substituted “the closing of the polls” for “that time” in the last sentence, added second paragraph, and in the last paragraph, substituted “total vote given by all absentee ballots” for “vote given by absentee ballot.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 471, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, substituted “shall” for “may” and “A central” for “The decision to establish any”; deleted the second paragraph in subsection C; in subsection D, substituted “shall” for “may” three times, and substituted “transmitted outside of the central absentee voter precinct until after” for “updated prior to” in the first paragraph, substituted “shall” for “may” and “noon” for “3:00 p.m.” in the first sentence of the second paragraph, and inserted “processing and” in the first sentence of the third paragraph; added the present subsection E designation, and redesignated former subsections E and F as subsections F and G.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 522, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, substituted “shall” for “may” in the first sentence, and substituted “A central” for “The decision to establish any” in the second sentence; deleted “pursuant to §

24.2-710

” at the end of the first paragraph in subsection C; in subsection D, substituted “shall” for “may” throughout, substituted “§

24.2-709.1

” for “§

24.2-711

” and “transmitted outside of the central absentee voter precinct until after” for “initiated prior to” in the first paragraph, and inserted “processing and” in the third paragraph; designated the former last paragraph in subsection D as subsection E; and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

§ 24.2-713.
Emergency authority of the Commissioner of Elections.

The provisions of this section shall apply in the case of an emergency that will not allow sufficient time for the distribution and handling of absentee ballot applications and absentee ballots, in accordance with the procedures of this title, for qualified voters who are unable to vote in person because of the emergency. The Commissioner of Elections shall have the authority to designate alternative methods and procedures to handle such applications and ballots. Nothing in this section shall authorize the counting of any absentee ballot returned after the polls have closed. For purposes of this section, “an emergency” shall mean (i) any emergency declared by the Governor pursuant to Chapter 3.2 (§ 44-146.13 et seq.) of Title 44, (ii) any emergency declared by the President of the United States or the governor of another state pursuant to law and confirmed by the Governor by the executive order as an emergency for the purposes of this section, or (iii) any public emergency that interferes with the electoral process or the opportunity for qualified voters to exercise their right to vote as determined by the Commissioner of Elections.

History.

1994, c. 240; 2002, cc. 785, 819; 2013, c. 542.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 785 and 819 are identical, and deleted “to ensure that qualified voters have the opportunity to exercise their right to vote in emergency situations” at the end of the second sentence, substituted “Nothing in this section shall authorize the counting of any absentee ballot returned after the polls have closed. For purposes of this section, “an emergency” shall mean (i) any” for “The provisions of this section shall be applicable only in the case of an,” substituted “(ii) any emergency” for “or” following “Title 44,” and inserted “or (iii) any public emergency that interferes with the electoral process or the opportunity for qualified voters to exercise their right to vote as determined by the Secretary of the State Board of Elections” at the end.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 542, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “Commissioner” for “Secretary of the State Board” in the second and last sentences.